NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/ru_RU/ru_RU_oo3.aff
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ТЈЫШУС       [^ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ТЈФУС        [^ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ТЈФЕУШ       [^ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ТЈНУС        [^ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ЕТХФУС       [ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ЕТХУШ        [ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ЕТЕЫШУС      [ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ЕТЕФУС       [ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ЕТЕФЕУШ      [ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ЕТЕНУС       [ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ЕТЈЫШУС      [ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ЕТЈФУС       [ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ЕТЈФЕУШ      [ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШУС ЕТЈНУС       [ВД]ТБФШУС
SFX Y   ТБФШ ТХФ          [^ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ТХ           [^ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ТЕЫШ         [^ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ТЕФЕ         [^ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ТЕФ          [^ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ТЕН          [^ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ТЈЫШ         [^ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ТЈФЕ         [^ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ТЈФ          [^ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ТЈН          [^ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ЕТХФ         [ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ЕТХ          [ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ЕТЕЫШ        [ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ЕТЕФЕ        [ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ЕТЕФ         [ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ЕТЕН         [ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ЕТЈЫШ        [ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ЕТЈФЕ        [ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ЕТЈФ         [ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   ТБФШ ЕТЈН         [ВД]ТБФШ
SFX Y   СФШУС ОХФУС        НСФШУС
SFX Y   СФШУС ОХУШ         НСФШУС
SFX Y   СФШУС ОЕЫШУС       НСФШУС
SFX Y   СФШУС ОЕФУС        НСФШУС
SFX Y   СФШУС ОЕФЕУШ       НСФШУС
SFX Y   СФШУС ОЕНУС        НСФШУС
SFX Y   СФШУС ОЈЫШУС       НСФШУС
SFX Y   СФШУС ОЈФУС        НСФШУС
SFX Y   СФШУС ОЈФЕУШ       НСФШУС
SFX Y   СФШУС ОЈНУС        НСФШУС
SFX Y   СФШ  ОХФ          НСФШ
SFX Y   СФШ  ОХ           НСФШ
SFX Y   СФШ  ОЕЫШ         НСФШ
SFX Y   СФШ  ОЕФЕ         НСФШ
SFX Y   СФШ  ОЕФ          НСФШ
SFX Y   СФШ  ОЕН          НСФШ
SFX Y   СФШ  ОЈЫШ         НСФШ
SFX Y   СФШ  ОЈФЕ         НСФШ
SFX Y   СФШ  ОЈФ          НСФШ
SFX Y   СФШ  ОЈН          НСФШ
SFX Y   ОБФШУС ПОСФУС       ЗОБФШУС
SFX Y   ОБФШУС ПОЙЫШУС      ЗОБФШУС
SFX Y   ОБФШУС ПОЙФУС       ЗОБФШУС
SFX Y   ОБФШУС ПОЙФЕУШ      ЗОБФШУС
SFX Y   ОБФШУС ПОЙНУС       ЗОБФШУС
SFX Y   ОБФШУС ПОАУШ        ЗОБФШУС
SFX Y   ОБФШ ПОСФ         ЗОБФШ
SFX Y   ОБФШ ПОЙЫШ        ЗОБФШ
SFX Y   ОБФШ ПОЙФЕ        ЗОБФШ
SFX Y   ОБФШ ПОЙФ         ЗОБФШ
SFX Y   ОБФШ ПОЙН         ЗОБФШ
SFX Y   ОБФШ ПОА          ЗОБФШ
SFX Y   ЛБФШУС ЮХФУС        [^У]ЛБФШУС
SFX Y   ЛБФШУС ЮХУШ         [^У]ЛБФШУС
SFX Y   ЛБФШУС ЮЕЫШУС       [^У]ЛБФШУС
SFX Y   ЛБФШУС ЮЕФУС        [^У]ЛБФШУС
SFX Y   ЛБФШУС ЮЕФЕУШ       [^У]ЛБФШУС
SFX Y   ЛБФШУС ЮЕНУС        [^У]ЛБФШУС
SFX Y   ЛБФШ ЮХФ          [^У]ЛБФШ
SFX Y   ЛБФШ ЮХ           [^У]ЛБФШ
SFX Y   ЛБФШ ЮЕЫШ         [^У]ЛБФШ
SFX Y   ЛБФШ ЮЕФЕ         [^У]ЛБФШ
SFX Y   ЛБФШ ЮЕФ          [^У]ЛБФШ
SFX Y   ЛБФШ ЮЕН          [^У]ЛБФШ
SFX Y   ЙФШ  ЕЫШ          МЙФШ
SFX Y   ЙФШ  ЕФЕ          МЙФШ
SFX Y   ЙФШ  ЕФ           МЙФШ
SFX Y   ЙФШ  ЕН           МЙФШ
SFX Y   ЙФШ  АФ           МЙФШ
SFX Y   ЙФШ  А            МЙФШ
SFX Y   Й    ХФ           ТБУФЙ
SFX Y   Й    Х            ТБУФЙ
SFX Y   Й    ЕЫШ          ТБУФЙ
SFX Y   Й    ЕФЕ          ТБУФЙ
SFX Y   Й    ЕФ           ТБУФЙ
SFX Y   Й    ЕН           ТБУФЙ
SFX Y   Й    ЈЫШ          ТБУФЙ
SFX Y   Й    ЈФЕ          ТБУФЙ
SFX Y   Й    ЈФ           ТБУФЙ
SFX Y   Й    ЈН           ТБУФЙ
SFX Y   ИБФШУС ЫХФУС        ИБФШУС
SFX Y   ИБФШУС ЫХУШ         ИБФШУС
SFX Y   ИБФШУС ЫЕЫШУС       ИБФШУС
SFX Y   ИБФШУС ЫЕФУС        ИБФШУС
SFX Y   ИБФШУС ЫЕФЕУШ       ИБФШУС
SFX Y   ИБФШУС ЫЕНУС        ИБФШУС
SFX Y   ИБФШ ЫХФ          ИБФШ
SFX Y   ИБФШ ЫХ           ИБФШ
SFX Y   ИБФШ ЫЕЫШ         ИБФШ
SFX Y   ИБФШ ЫЕФЕ         ИБФШ
SFX Y   ИБФШ ЫЕФ          ИБФШ
SFX Y   ИБФШ ЫЕН          ИБФШ
SFX Y   ЕФШУС СФУС         [ДТФ]ЕФШУС
SFX Y   ЕФШУС МАУШ         РЕФШУС
SFX Y   ЕФШУС ЙЫШУС        [ДТФ]ЕФШУС
SFX Y   ЕФШУС ЙФУС         [ДТФ]ЕФШУС
SFX Y   ЕФШУС ЙФЕУШ        [ДТФ]ЕФШУС
SFX Y   ЕФШУС ЙНУС         [ДТФ]ЕФШУС
SFX Y   ЕФШУС АУШ          ТЕФШУС
SFX Y   ЕФШ  СФ           [ДНОРТУФ]ЕФШ
SFX Y   ЕФШ  МА           РЕФШ
SFX Y   ЕФШ  ЙЫШ          [ДНОРТУФ]ЕФШ
SFX Y   ЕФШ  ЙФЕ          [ДНОРТУФ]ЕФШ
SFX Y   ЕФШ  ЙФ           [ДНОРТУФ]ЕФШ
SFX Y   ЕФШ  ЙН           [ДНОРТУФ]ЕФШ
SFX Y   ЕФШ  А            ТЕФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ ФХФ          ЮЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ ФХ           ЮЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ ФЕЫШ         ЮЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ ФЕФЕ         ЮЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ ФЕФ          ЮЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ ФЕН          ЮЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ ФЈЫШ         ЮЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ ФЈФЕ         ЮЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ ФЈФ          ЮЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ ФЈН          ЮЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ СДХФ         УЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ СДХ          УЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ СДЕЫШ        УЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ СДЕФЕ        УЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ СДЕФ         УЕУФШ
SFX Y   ЕУФШ СДЕН         УЕУФШ
SFX Y   ДЕФШУС ЦХУШ         ДЕФШУС
SFX Y   ДЕФШ ЦХ           ДЕФШ
SFX Y   БФШУС ХФУС         ТЧБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ХФУС         ПУБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ХУШ          ТЧБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ХУШ          ПУБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС СФУС         УРБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС МАУШ         УРБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЙЫШУС        ЦБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЙЫШУС        УРБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЙФУС         ЦБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЙФУС         УРБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЙФЕУШ        ЦБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЙФЕУШ        УРБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЙНУС         ЦБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЙНУС         УРБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЕЫШУС        ТЧБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЕЫШУС        ПУБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЕФУС         ТЧБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЕФУС         ПУБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЕФЕУШ        ТЧБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЕФЕУШ        ПУБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЕНУС         ТЧБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЕНУС         ПУБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЈЫШУС        ТЧБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЈЫШУС        ПУБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЈФУС         ТЧБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЈФУС         ПУБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЈФЕУШ        ТЧБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЈФЕУШ        ПУБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЈНУС         ТЧБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШУС ЈНУС         ПУБФШУС
SFX Y   БФШ  ХФ           ТЧБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ХФ           ПУБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  Х            ТЧБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  Х            ПУБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  СФ           УРБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  МА           УРБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЙЫШ          ЦБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЙЫШ          УРБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЙФЕ          ЦБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЙФЕ          УРБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЙФ           ЦБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЙФ           УРБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЙН           ЦБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЙН           УРБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЕЫШ          ТЧБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЕЫШ          ПУБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЕФЕ          ТЧБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЕФЕ          ПУБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЕФ           ТЧБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЕФ           ПУБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЕН           ТЧБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЕН           ПУБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЈЫШ          ТЧБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЈЫШ          ПУБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЈФЕ          ТЧБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЈФЕ          ПУБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЈФ           ТЧБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЈФ           ПУБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЈН           ТЧБФШ
SFX Y   БФШ  ЈН           ПУБФШ

SFX X Y 3
SFX X   ЩК   Щ            ООЩК
SFX X   ЩК   П            ООЩК
SFX X   ЩК   Б            ООЩК

SFX W Y 28
SFX W   ЪЙФШУС ЦХУШ         ЪЙФШУС
SFX W   ЪЙФШ ЦХ           ЪЙФШ
SFX W   ШУС  УС           ЙФШУС
SFX W   ШУС  ЕУШ          ЙФШУС
SFX W   Ш    Е            ЙФШ
SFX W   ФШУС ЫШУС         ЙФШУС
SFX W   ФШУС НУС          ЙФШУС
SFX W   ФШ   ЫШ           ЙФШ
SFX W   ФШ   Ф            ЙФШ
SFX W   ФШ   Н            ЙФШ
SFX W   ФЙФШУС ЮХУШ         [^АБЕЙПСУХЩЬЮ]ФЙФШУС
SFX W   ФЙФШ ЮХ           [^АБЕЙПСУХЩЬЮ]ФЙФШ
SFX W   УФЙФШУС ЭХУШ         УФЙФШУС
SFX W   УФЙФШ ЭХ           УФЙФШ
SFX W   УЙФШУС ЫХУШ         УЙФШУС
SFX W   УЙФШ ЫХ           УЙФШ
SFX W   ЙФШУС ХУШ          [ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШУС
SFX W   ЙФШУС СФУС         [^ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШУС
SFX W   ЙФШУС МАУШ         [ВЖНРЧ]ЙФШУС
SFX W   ЙФШУС БФУС         [ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШУС
SFX W   ЙФШУС АУШ          [БЕМОПТХ]ЙФШУС
SFX W   ЙФШ  Х            [ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШ
SFX W   ЙФШ  СФ           [^ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШ
SFX W   ЙФШ  МА           [ВЖНРЧ]ЙФШ
SFX W   ЙФШ  БФ           [ЦЫЭЮ]ЙФШ
SFX W   ЙФШ  А            [БЕМОПТХ]ЙФШ
SFX W   ДЙФШУС ЦХУШ         ДЙФШУС
SFX W   ДЙФШ ЦХ           ДЙФШ
